Illinois, session 104th, HB3471.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-275 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/9-275)7    Sec. 9-275. Erroneous homestead exemptions. 8    (a) For purposes of this Section:9    "Erroneous homestead exemption" means a homestead 10exemption that was granted for real property in a taxable year 11if the property was not eligible for that exemption in that 12taxable year. If the taxpayer receives an erroneous homestead 13exemption under a single Section of this Code for the same 14property in multiple years, that exemption is considered a 15single erroneous homestead exemption for purposes of this 16Section. However, if the taxpayer receives erroneous homestead 17exemptions under multiple Sections of this Code for the same 18property, or if the taxpayer receives erroneous homestead 19exemptions under the same Section of this Code for multiple 20properties, then each of those exemptions is considered a 21separate erroneous homestead exemption for purposes of this 22Section. 23    "Homestead exemption" means an exemption under Section   HB3471- 2 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b115-165 (veterans with disabilities), 15-167 (returning 2veterans), 15-168 (persons with disabilities), 15-169 3(standard homestead for veterans with disabilities), 15-170 4(senior citizens), 15-172 (low-income senior citizens 5assessment freeze), 15-175 (general homestead), 15-176 6(alternative general homestead), or 15-177 (long-time 7occupant).8    "Erroneous exemption principal amount" means the total 9difference between the property taxes actually billed to a 10property index number and the amount of property taxes that 11would have been billed but for the erroneous exemption or 12exemptions. 13    "Taxpayer" means the property owner or leasehold owner 14that erroneously received a homestead exemption upon property. 15    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in 16counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the chief county 17assessment officer shall include the following information 18with each assessment notice sent in a general assessment year: 19(1) a list of each homestead exemption available under Article 2015 of this Code and a description of the eligibility criteria 21for that exemption, including the number of assessment years 22of automatic renewal remaining on a current senior citizens 23homestead exemption if such an exemption has been applied to 24the property; (2) a list of each homestead exemption applied 25to the property in the current assessment year; (3) 26information regarding penalties and interest that may be   HB3471- 3 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1incurred under this Section if the taxpayer received an 2erroneous homestead exemption in a previous taxable year; and 3(4) notice of the 60-day grace period available under this 4subsection. If, within 60 days after receiving his or her 5assessment notice, the taxpayer notifies the chief county 6assessment officer that he or she received an erroneous 7homestead exemption in a previous taxable year, and if the 8taxpayer pays the erroneous exemption principal amount, plus 9interest as provided in subsection (f), then the taxpayer 10shall not be liable for the penalties provided in subsection 11(f) with respect to that exemption.12    (c) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, when 13the chief county assessment officer determines that one or 14more erroneous homestead exemptions was applied to the 15property, the erroneous exemption principal amount, together 16with all applicable interest and penalties as provided in 17subsections (f) and (j), shall constitute a lien in the name of 18the People of Cook County on the property receiving the 19erroneous homestead exemption. Upon becoming aware of the 20existence of one or more erroneous homestead exemptions, the 21chief county assessment officer shall cause to be served, by 22both regular mail and certified mail, a notice of discovery as 23set forth in subsection (c-5). The chief county assessment 24officer in a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants may 25cause a lien to be recorded against property that (1) is 26located in the county and (2) received one or more erroneous   HB3471- 4 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1homestead exemptions if, upon determination of the chief 2county assessment officer, the taxpayer received: (A) one or 2 3erroneous homestead exemptions for real property, including at 4least one erroneous homestead exemption granted for the 5property against which the lien is sought, during any of the 3 6collection years immediately prior to the current collection 7year in which the notice of discovery is served; or (B) 3 or 8more erroneous homestead exemptions for real property, 9including at least one erroneous homestead exemption granted 10for the property against which the lien is sought, during any 11of the 6 collection years immediately prior to the current 12collection year in which the notice of discovery is served. 13Prior to recording the lien against the property, the chief 14county assessment officer shall cause to be served, by both 15regular mail and certified mail, return receipt requested, on 16the person to whom the most recent tax bill was mailed and the 17owner of record, a notice of intent to record a lien against 18the property. The chief county assessment officer shall cause 19the notice of intent to record a lien to be served within 3 20years from the date on which the notice of discovery was 21served. 22    (c-5) The notice of discovery described in subsection (c) 23shall: (1) identify, by property index number, the property 24for which the chief county assessment officer has knowledge 25indicating the existence of an erroneous homestead exemption; 26(2) set forth the taxpayer's liability for principal,   HB3471- 5 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1interest, penalties, and administrative costs including, but 2not limited to, recording fees described in subsection (f); 3(3) inform the taxpayer that he or she will be served with a 4notice of intent to record a lien within 3 years from the date 5of service of the notice of discovery; (4) inform the taxpayer 6that he or she may pay the outstanding amount, plus interest, 7penalties, and administrative costs at any time prior to being 8served with the notice of intent to record a lien or within 30 9days after the notice of intent to record a lien is served; and 10(5) inform the taxpayer that, if the taxpayer provided notice 11to the chief county assessment officer as provided in 12subsection (d-1) of Section 15-175 of this Code, upon 13submission by the taxpayer of evidence of timely notice and 14receipt thereof by the chief county assessment officer, the 15chief county assessment officer will withdraw the notice of 16discovery and reissue a notice of discovery in compliance with 17this Section in which the taxpayer is not liable for interest 18and penalties for the current tax year in which the notice was 19received. 20    For the purposes of this subsection (c-5): 21    "Collection year" means the year in which the first and 22second installment of the current tax year is billed. 23    "Current tax year" means the year prior to the collection 24year. 25    (d) The notice of intent to record a lien described in 26subsection (c) shall: (1) identify, by property index number,   HB3471- 6 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1the property against which the lien is being sought; (2) 2identify each specific homestead exemption that was 3erroneously granted and the year or years in which each 4exemption was granted; (3) set forth the erroneous exemption 5principal amount due and the interest amount and any penalty 6and administrative costs due; (4) inform the taxpayer that he 7or she may request a hearing within 30 days after service and 8may appeal the hearing officer's ruling to the circuit court; 9(5) inform the taxpayer that he or she may pay the erroneous 10exemption principal amount, plus interest and penalties, 11within 30 days after service; and (6) inform the taxpayer 12that, if the lien is recorded against the property, the amount 13of the lien will be adjusted to include the applicable 14recording fee and that fees for recording a release of the lien 15shall be incurred by the taxpayer. A lien shall not be filed 16pursuant to this Section if the taxpayer pays the erroneous 17exemption principal amount, plus penalties and interest, 18within 30 days of service of the notice of intent to record a 19lien. 20    (e) The notice of intent to record a lien shall also 21include a form that the taxpayer may return to the chief county 22assessment officer to request a hearing. The taxpayer may 23request a hearing by returning the form within 30 days after 24service. The hearing shall be held within 90 days after the 25taxpayer is served. The chief county assessment officer shall 26promulgate rules of service and procedure for the hearing. The   HB3471- 7 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1chief county assessment officer must generally follow rules of 2evidence and practices that prevail in the county circuit 3courts, but, because of the nature of these proceedings, the 4chief county assessment officer is not bound by those rules in 5all particulars. The chief county assessment officer shall 6appoint a hearing officer to oversee the hearing. The taxpayer 7shall be allowed to present evidence to the hearing officer at 8the hearing. After taking into consideration all the relevant 9testimony and evidence, the hearing officer shall make an 10administrative decision on whether the taxpayer was 11erroneously granted a homestead exemption for the taxable year 12in question. The taxpayer may appeal the hearing officer's 13ruling to the circuit court of the county where the property is 14located as a final administrative decision under the 15Administrative Review Law. 16    (f) A lien against the property imposed under this Section 17shall be filed with the county recorder of deeds, but may not 18be filed sooner than 60 days after the notice of intent to 19record a lien was delivered to the taxpayer if the taxpayer 20does not request a hearing, or until the conclusion of the 21hearing and all appeals if the taxpayer does request a 22hearing. If a lien is filed pursuant to this Section and the 23taxpayer received one or 2 erroneous homestead exemptions 24during any of the 3 collection years immediately prior to the 25current collection year in which the notice of discovery is 26served, then the erroneous exemption principal amount, plus   HB3471- 8 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b110% interest per annum or portion thereof from the date the 2erroneous exemption principal amount would have become due if 3properly included in the tax bill, shall be charged against 4the property by the chief county assessment officer. However, 5if a lien is filed pursuant to this Section and the taxpayer 6received 3 or more erroneous homestead exemptions during any 7of the 6 collection years immediately prior to the current 8collection year in which the notice of discovery is served, 9the erroneous exemption principal amount, plus a penalty of 1050% of the total amount of the erroneous exemption principal 11amount for that property and 10% interest per annum or portion 12thereof from the date the erroneous exemption principal amount 13would have become due if properly included in the tax bill, 14shall be charged against the property by the chief county 15assessment officer. If a lien is filed pursuant to this 16Section, the taxpayer shall not be liable for interest that 17accrues between the date the notice of discovery is served and 18the date the lien is filed. Before recording the lien with the 19county recorder of deeds, the chief county assessment officer 20shall adjust the amount of the lien to add administrative 21costs, including but not limited to the applicable recording 22fee, to the total lien amount. 23    (g) If a person received an erroneous homestead exemption 24under Section 15-170 and: (1) the person was the spouse, 25child, grandchild, brother, sister, niece, or nephew of the 26previous taxpayer; and (2) the person received the property by   HB3471- 9 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1bequest or inheritance; then the person is not liable for the 2penalties imposed under this Section for any year or years 3during which the chief county assessment officer did not 4require an annual application for the exemption or, in a 5county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, an application for 6renewal of a multi-year exemption pursuant to subsection (i) 7of Section 15-170, as the case may be. However, that person is 8responsible for any interest owed under subsection (f). 9    (h) If the erroneous homestead exemption was granted as a 10result of a clerical error or omission on the part of the chief 11county assessment officer, and if the taxpayer has paid the 12tax bills as received for the year in which the error occurred, 13then the interest and penalties authorized by this Section 14with respect to that homestead exemption shall not be 15chargeable to the taxpayer. However, nothing in this Section 16shall prevent the collection of the erroneous exemption 17principal amount due and owing. 18    (i) A lien under this Section is not valid as to (1) any 19bona fide purchaser for value without notice of the erroneous 20homestead exemption whose rights in and to the underlying 21parcel arose after the erroneous homestead exemption was 22granted but before the filing of the notice of lien; or (2) any 23mortgagee, judgment creditor, or other lienor whose rights in 24and to the underlying parcel arose before the filing of the 25notice of lien. A title insurance policy for the property that 26is issued by a title company licensed to do business in the   HB3471- 10 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1State showing that the property is free and clear of any liens 2imposed under this Section shall be prima facie evidence that 3the taxpayer is without notice of the erroneous homestead 4exemption. Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to impair 5the rights of subsequent creditors and subsequent purchasers 6under Section 30 of the Conveyances Act. 7    (j) When a lien is filed against the property pursuant to 8this Section, the chief county assessment officer shall mail a 9copy of the lien to the person to whom the most recent tax bill 10was mailed and to the owner of record, and the outstanding 11liability created by such a lien is due and payable within 30 12days after the mailing of the lien by the chief county 13assessment officer. This liability is deemed delinquent and 14shall bear interest beginning on the day after the due date at 15a rate of 1.5% per month or portion thereof. Payment shall be 16made to the county treasurer. Upon receipt of the full amount 17due, as determined by the chief county assessment officer, the 18county treasurer shall distribute the amount paid as provided 19in subsection (k). Upon presentment by the taxpayer to the 20chief county assessment officer of proof of payment of the 21total liability, the chief county assessment officer shall 22provide in reasonable form a release of the lien. The release 23of the lien provided shall clearly inform the taxpayer that it 24is the responsibility of the taxpayer to record the lien 25release form with the county recorder of deeds and to pay any 26applicable recording fees.   HB3471- 11 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1    (k) The county treasurer shall pay collected erroneous 2exemption principal amounts, pro rata, to the taxing 3districts, or their legal successors, that levied upon the 4subject property in the taxable year or years for which the 5erroneous homestead exemptions were granted, except as set 6forth in this Section. The county treasurer shall deposit 7collected penalties and interest into a special fund 8established by the county treasurer to offset the costs of 9administration of the provisions of this Section by the chief 10county assessment officer's office, as appropriated by the 11county board. If the costs of administration of this Section 12exceed the amount of interest and penalties collected in the 13special fund, the chief county assessor shall be reimbursed by 14each taxing district or their legal successors for those 15costs. Such costs shall be paid out of the funds collected by 16the county treasurer on behalf of each taxing district 17pursuant to this Section. 18    (l) The chief county assessment officer in a county with 193,000,000 or more inhabitants shall establish an amnesty 20period for all taxpayers owing any tax due to an erroneous 21homestead exemption granted in a tax year prior to the 2013 tax 22year. The amnesty period shall begin on the effective date of 23this amendatory Act of the 98th General Assembly and shall run 24through December 31, 2013. If, during the amnesty period, the 25taxpayer pays the entire arrearage of taxes due for tax years 26prior to 2013, the county clerk shall abate and not seek to   HB3471- 12 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1collect any interest or penalties that may be applicable and 2shall not seek civil or criminal prosecution for any taxpayer 3for tax years prior to 2013. Failure to pay all such taxes due 4during the amnesty period established under this Section shall 5invalidate the amnesty period for that taxpayer. 6    The chief county assessment officer in a county with 73,000,000 or more inhabitants shall (i) mail notice of the 8amnesty period with the tax bills for the second installment 9of taxes for the 2012 assessment year and (ii) as soon as 10possible after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 11the 98th General Assembly, publish notice of the amnesty 12period in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. 13Notices shall include information on the amnesty period, its 14purpose, and the method by which to make payment. 15    Taxpayers who are a party to any criminal investigation or 16to any civil or criminal litigation that is pending in any 17circuit court or appellate court, or in the Supreme Court of 18this State, for nonpayment, delinquency, or fraud in relation 19to any property tax imposed by any taxing district located in 20the State on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2198th General Assembly may not take advantage of the amnesty 22period. 23    A taxpayer who has claimed 3 or more homestead exemptions 24in error shall not be eligible for the amnesty period 25established under this subsection. 26    (m) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for   HB3471- 13 -LRB104 08131 HLH 18177 b1taxable years 2019 through 2023, in counties with 3,000,000 or 2more inhabitants, the chief county assessment officer shall, 3if he or she learns that a taxpayer who has been granted a 4senior citizens homestead exemption has died during the period 5to which the exemption applies, send a notice to the address on 6record for the owner of record of the property notifying the 7owner that the exemption will be terminated unless, within 90 8days after the notice is sent, the chief county assessment 9officer is provided with a basis to continue the exemption. 10The notice shall be sent by first-class mail, in an envelope 11that bears on its front, in boldface red lettering that is at 12least one inch in size, the words "Notice of Exemption 13Termination"; however, if the taxpayer elects to receive the 14notice by email and provides an email address, then the notice 15shall be sent by email. 16    (n) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for 17taxable year 2026 and thereafter, this Section also applies in 18counties with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants to persons who 19received an erroneous homestead exemption under Section 15-172 20(low-income senior citizens assessment freeze). 21(Source: P.A. 101-453, eff. 8-23-19; 101-622, eff. 1-14-20; 22102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.